Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.080

School year—For certification or qualification purposes.

The school year for all matters pertaining to teacher certification or for computing experience in teaching shall consist of not fewer than one hundred eighty school days.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.01.025. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 262 s 3, part; RRS s 4687, part; prior: 1903 c 104 s 22, part. Formerly RCW 28A.01.025, 28.01.010, part.]